langs/is/common-aff.d/22_fallbeyging_kk.aff
#kk et agr
SFX 1	N 21
SFX 1	ur	0
SFX 1	n	0	nn
SFX 1	l	0	ll
SFX 1	ur	i
SFX 1	n	i	einn
SFX 1	n	i	ónn
SFX 1	inn	ni	[^e]inn
SFX 1	unn	ni
SFX 1	ill	li
SFX 1	all	li
SFX 1	ull	li
SFX 1	0	i	u[^r]
SFX 1	0	i	n[^n]
SFX 1	0	i	[^unl][^l]
SFX 1	0	i	[^l]l
SFX 1	ur	s
SFX 1	n	s	nn
SFX 1	l	s	ll
SFX 1	0	s	u[^r]
SFX 1	0	s	n[^n]
SFX 1	0	s	[^un].

#kk et gr
SFX 2	N 22
SFX 2	0	inn
SFX 2	ur	inn
SFX 2	n	inn	nn
SFX 2	l	inn	ll
SFX 2	ur	inum
SFX 2	n	inum	einn
SFX 2	n	inum	ónn
SFX 2	inn	ninum	[^e]inn
SFX 2	unn	ninum
SFX 2	ill	linum
SFX 2	all	linum
SFX 2	ull	linum
SFX 2	0	inum	u[^r]
SFX 2	0	inum	n[^n]
SFX 2	0	inum	[^unl][^l]
SFX 2	0	inum	[^l]l
SFX 2	ur	sins
SFX 2	n	sins	nn
SFX 2	l	sins	ll
SFX 2	0	sins	u[^r]
SFX 2	0	sins	n[^n]
SFX 2	0	sins	[^un].

#kk et agr -s
SFX 3	N 7
SFX 3	ur	0	ur
SFX 3	n	0	nn
SFX 3	ur	i	ur
SFX 3	n	i	nn
SFX 3	0	i	u[^r]
SFX 3	0	i	n[^n]
SFX 3	0	i	[^un].

#kk et gr -s
SFX 4	N 13
SFX 4	0	inn
SFX 4	ur	inn	ur
SFX 4	n	inn	nn
SFX 4	ur	inum	ur
SFX 4	n	inum	nn
SFX 4	0	inum	u[^r]
SFX 4	0	inum	n[^n]
SFX 4	0	inum	[^un].
SFX 4	ur	ins	ur
SFX 4	n	ins	nn
SFX 4	0	ins	u[^r]
SFX 4	0	ins	n[^n]
SFX 4	0	ins	[^un].

#kk sb/vb ft agr
SFX 5	N 4
SFX 5	r	0
SFX 5	ar	um
SFX 5	ir	um
SFX 5	ir	a

#kk sb/vb ft gr
SFX 6	N 6
SFX 6	0	nir
SFX 6	r	na
SFX 6	ar	unum
SFX 6	ir	unum
SFX 6	ar	anna
SFX 6	ir	anna

#kk sb/vb ft agr
SFX 7	N 1
SFX 7	r	0

#kk sb/vb ft gr
SFX 8	N 3
SFX 8	0	nir
SFX 8	r	na
SFX 8	r	nna

#kk sb et agr a
SFX 11	N 7
SFX 11	ur	0	[^a]ur
SFX 11	l	0	ll
SFX 11	ur	s	[^a]ur
SFX 11	0	s	aur
SFX 11	0	s	[^rl]
SFX 11	0	s	[^ul].
SFX 11	l	s	ll

#kk et gr b
SFX 12	N 13
SFX 12	0	inn
SFX 12	ur	inn	[^a]ur
SFX 12	l	inn	ll
SFX 12	ur	num	[^a]ur
SFX 12	0	num	aur
SFX 12	l	num	ll
SFX 12	0	num	[^rl]
SFX 12	0	num	[^ul].
SFX 12	ur	sins	[^a]ur
SFX 12	0	sins	aur
SFX 12	0	sins	[^rl]
SFX 12	0	sins	[^ul].
SFX 12	l	sins	ll

#kk vb et agr
SFX 22	N 1
SFX 22	i	a

#kk vb et gr
SFX 23	N 4
SFX 23	0	nn
SFX 23	i	ann
SFX 23	i	anum
SFX 23	i	ans

#son/dóttir
SFX 26	N 11
SFX 26	0	son
SFX 26	0	syni
SFX 26	0	sonar
SFX 26	0	synir
SFX 26	0	sonum
SFX 26	0	sona
SFX 26	0	dóttir
SFX 26	0	dóttur
SFX 26	0	dætur
SFX 26	0	dætrum
SFX 26	0	dætra
	
